Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB868.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 708(b) of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 708. Exceptions for public records.* * *(b) Exceptions.--Except as provided in subsections (c) and (d), the following are exempt from access by a requester under this act:12345678910111213141516171819202122 * * *(31) Records that are reasonably burdensome in their scope for an agency to produce.* * *Section 2. Section 1307(h) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1307. Fee limitations.* * *(h) Prepayment.--Prior to granting a request for access in accordance with this act, an agency may require a requester to prepay an estimate of the fees authorized under this section if the fees required to fulfill the request are expected to exceed $100 in accordance with subsection (i).(i) For-profit entity fees.--(1) An agency shall be permitted to charge reasonable fees, in addition to other fees authorized by this act, for the processing of records requests which are intended for use by for-profit entities or for-profit activities. Fees under this subsection shall be payable in advance and the agency's time for response shall commence from the date of receipt of the fee. Agencies shall be required to notify the requester of the required fee within five business days of receipt of the records request. An agency may make inquiries of a requester to determine whether the requester is a for-profit entity or engaged in for-profit activity, including inquiries concerning the purpose of the request.(2) Newspapers, magazines, broadcast outlets and similar organizations shall be exempt from the fee provided in paragraph (1).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0868PN0904 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930